it: Corde incluse per strumenti ad arco: La; Si; Do; Re; Mi; Fa# (estensione); Sol; Estensione Do basso; Altro
zh-CN: 管弦乐器附带琴弦: A; B; C; D; E; F#（延长音）; G; 低音 C（延长音）; 其他
tr: Dahil olan orkestra teli türleri: La (A); Si (B); Do (C); Re (D); Mi (E); Fa# (F#) uzantısı; Sol (G); Kalın Do (C) uzantısı; Diğer
cs: Součástí orchestru byly smyčcové nástroje: A; H; C; D; E; Fis (extenze); G; Extenze pro nízké C; Ostatní
ru: Струны оркестровых струнных инструментов в комплекте: A; B; C; D; E; F# (расширение); G; Расширение нижнего C; Другое
hr-HR: Uključene žice orkestralnog gudačkog instrumenta: A; B; C; D; E; F# (ekstenzija); G; Niska C ekstenzija; Ostalo
nb: Inkluderte strenger til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter: A; B; C; D; E; F# (forlengelse); G; Lav C-forlengelse; Annet
zh-TW: 管弦樂器包含琴弦: A; B; C; D; E; F# (延長音); G; 低音 C 延長音; 其他
bg-BG: Включени струни за оркестров струнен инструмент: A; B; C; D; E; F# (разширение); G; Разширение за ниско C; Друго
th: ชุดเครื่องสายออร์เคสตราที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: A; B; C; D; E; F# (ต่อขยาย); G; สายต่อ Low C; อื่นๆ
sv: Strängar för orkesterstränginstrument som ingår: A; B; C; D; E; F# (förlängning); G; Låg C-förlängning; Övrigt
en: Orchestral string included strings: A; B; C; D; E; F# (extension); G; Low C extension; Other
es: Cuerdas incluidas para instrumentos de cuerdas de orquesta: A; B; C; D; E; Fa# (extensión); G; Extensión de Do bajo; Otro
sl-SI: Vključene strune v kompletu za orkestrske strunski instrument: A; B; C; D; E; F# (podaljšek); G; Podaljšek za nizki C; Drugo
sk-SK: Súčasťou orchestrálnych sláčikových nástrojov sú struny: A; H; C; D; E; F# (predĺženie); G; Predĺženie na nízke C; Iné
ko: 오케스트라 현악기 포함 현: A; B; C; D; E; F#(확장); G; 로우 C 확장; 기타
pt-PT: Cordas incluídas para instrumentos de cordas de orquestra: A; B; C; D; E; F# (extensão); G; Extensão C grave; Outro
de: Saiten für Streichinstrumente: A; B; C; D; E; F# (Verlängerung); G; Tiefe C-Verlängerung; Sonstige
lt-LT: Prie orkestrinių styginių instrumentų pridedamos stygos: A; B; C; D; E; F# (prailginta); G; Žemo C prailginta; Kita
fr: Cordes d'orchestre incluses: La; Si; Do; Ré; Mi; Fa# (extension); Sol; Extension de Do grave; Autre
el: Χορδές που περιλαμβάνονται στο πακέτο του ορχηστρικού έγχορδου οργάνου: A; B; C; D; E; F# (προέκταση); G; Προέκταση χαμηλής C; Άλλο
ja: オーケストラ弦楽器用弦に含まれる弦: A線; B線; C線; D線; E線; F#線 (エクステンション); G線; Low Cエクステンション; その他
fi: Jousisoitinten mukana tulevat kielet: A; B; C; D; E; F# (jatke); G; Matala C-jatke; Muu
hu: Zenekari húros hangszerhez mellékelt húrok: A; B; C; D; E; F# (bővítmény); G; Alsó C bővítő; Egyéb
da: Medfølgende strenge til orkesterstrengeinstrument: A; B; C; D; E; F# (forlængelse); G; Lavt C (forlængelse); Andet
pt-BR: Cordas incluídas no conjunto: A; B; C; D; E; F# (extensão); G; Extensão de C grave; Outros
vi: Các dây đi kèm của nhạc cụ dây giao hưởng: A (La); B (Si); C (Đô); D (Rê); E (Mi); F# (mở rộng); G (Son); Đô (C) trầm mở rộng; Khác
pl: Dołączone struny instrumentu smyczkowego orkiestrowego: A; B; C; D; E; F# (rozszerzenie); G; Rozszerzenie niskiego C; Inne
nl: Inbegrepen snaren voor orkeststrijkinstrumenten: A; B; C; D; E; F# (extensie); G; Lage C-extensie; Overige
ro-RO: Corzi incluse pentru instrumente cu corzi orchestrale: A; B; C; D; E; F# (extensie); G; Extensie pentru C grav; Altele